Tennessee, session 114, SB2082.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. From the funds available to the Department of Transportation, there is
earmarked a sum sufficient for the sole purpose of funding any general bill or resolution, duly
enacted by the 2026 session of the One Hundred Fourteenth General Assembly, which
designates an interstate, United States highway, or state highway as a memorial highway or
designates a bridge on such routes as a memorial bridge for certain individuals killed in the line
of duty, as described in Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 54-1-133.
SECTION 2. It is the legislative intent to recognize a revenue loss from bills duly
enacted by the 2026 session of the One Hundred Fourteenth General Assembly that result in no
expenditure increase but forgo revenue that has not been collected previously.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2082
012111
- 1 -